Mississippi, session 2026, HB81.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 23-15-653, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-653.  All registrars' offices shall remain open until * * *noon 5:00 p.m. on the two (2) Saturdays prior to each election. SECTION 2.  Section 23-15-637, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-637.  (1)  (a) Absentee ballots and applications received by mail, except for fax or electronically transmitted ballots as otherwise provided by Section 23-15-699 for UOCAVA ballots, or common carrier, such as United Parcel Service or FedEx Corporation, must be postmarked on or before the date of the election and received by the registrar no more than five (5) business days after the election; any received after such time shall be handled as provided in Section 23-15-647 and shall not be counted. (b)  All ballots cast by the absent elector appearing in person in the office of the registrar shall be cast with an absentee paper ballot and deposited into a sealed ballot box by the voter, not later than * * *12:00 noon 5:00 p.m. on the Saturday immediately preceding elections held on Tuesday, the Thursday immediately preceding elections held on Saturday, or the second day immediately preceding the date of elections held on other days.  At the close of business each day at the office of the registrar, the ballot box used shall be sealed and not unsealed until the beginning of the next business day, and the seal number shall be recorded with the number of ballots cast which shall be stored in a secure location in the registrar's office. (2)  The registrar shall deposit all absentee ballots which have been timely cast and received by mail in a secured and sealed box in a designated location in the registrar's office upon receipt.  The registrar shall not send any absentee ballots to the precinct polling locations. (3)  The Secretary of State shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to ensure that when a qualified elector who is qualified to vote absentee votes by absentee ballot, either by mail or in person with a regular paper ballot, that person's absentee vote is final and he or she may not vote at the polling place on election day. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the Secretary of State shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to ensure that absentee ballots shall remain in the registrar's office for counting and not be taken to the precincts on election day. SECTION 3.  Section 23-15-715, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-715.  Any elector desiring an absentee ballot as provided in this subarticle may secure * * * same an absentee ballot if: (a)  Not more than forty-five (45) days nor later than * * *12:00 noon 5:00 p.m., on the Saturday immediately preceding elections held on Tuesday, the Thursday immediately preceding elections held on Saturday, or the second day immediately preceding the date of elections held on other days, he or she * * * shall appears in person before the registrar of the county in which he or she resides, or for municipal elections, he * * *shall or she appears in person before the city clerk of the municipality in which he or she resides and, when the elector so appears, he or she shall execute and file an application as provided in Section 23-15-627 and vote by absentee ballot.  If the absentee ballot has not been printed by forty-five (45) days preceding the election, the elector may appear and file an application anytime before the election.  Then the absentee ballot shall be mailed by the registrar to the elector as soon as the ballot has been printed. (b)  Within forty-five (45) days next prior to any election, any elector who cannot comply with paragraph (a) of this section by reason of temporarily residing outside the county, or any person who has a temporary or permanent physical disability, persons who are sixty-five (65) years of age or older, any person who is incarcerated in prison or jail in the county where the person is registered to vote and has not been convicted of a disenfranchising crime, or any person who is the parent, spouse or dependent of a temporarily or permanently physically disabled person who is hospitalized outside of his or her county of residence or more than fifty (50) miles away from his or her residence and such parent, spouse or dependent will be with such person on election day, may make application for an absentee ballot by mailing the appropriate application to the registrar.  Only persons temporarily residing out of the county of their residence, persons having a temporary or permanent physical disability, persons who are sixty-five (65) years of age or older, any person who is incarcerated in prison or jail in the county where the person is registered to vote and has not been convicted of a disenfranchising crime, or any person who is the parent, spouse or dependent of a temporarily or permanently physically disabled person who is hospitalized outside of his or her county of residence or more than fifty (50) miles away from his or her  residence, and such parent, spouse or dependent will be with such person on election day, may obtain absentee ballots by mail under the provisions of this subsection and as provided by Section 23-15-713.  Applications of persons temporarily residing outside the county shall be sworn to and subscribed before an official who is authorized to administer oaths or other official authorized to witness absentee balloting as provided in this chapter, * * * said and the application * * * to must be accompanied by such verifying affidavits as required by this chapter.  The applications of persons having a temporary or permanent physical disability shall not be required to be accompanied by an affidavit but shall be witnessed and signed by a person eighteen (18) years of age or older.  The registrar shall send to such absent voter a proper absentee voter ballot within twenty-four (24) hours, or as soon thereafter as the ballots are available, containing the names of all candidates who qualify or the proposition to be voted on in such election, and with such ballot there shall be sent an official envelope containing upon it in printed form the recitals and data hereinafter required. (c)  Except when the voter has requested a runoff ballot on the initial absentee ballot application, upon request for a runoff ballot pursuant to Section 23-15-719, the registrar shall mail together the absentee ballot application and the absentee ballot to the absent voter for the runoff election. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.